New York, session 2025-2026, A2030.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of taxation and finance, in consultation 2 with the commissioner of education, public libraries, public library 3 systems, association libraries, and with the state librarian of the 4 division of library development, shall study the frequency of residents 5 who are being assessed library taxes for more than one public library or 6 association library, provided that such study shall exclude any public 7 library or association library that is wholly contained within another 8 public library or association library district, and shall make recommen- 9 dations to address the double taxation of residents. Such study shall 10 include, but not be limited to, the following: 11 (a) the estimated number of residents who are being assessed library 12 taxes for more than one public library or association library and the 13 amount of money such residents are paying in library taxes to each 14 public library and association library; 15 (b) the estimated economic impact on public libraries and association 16 libraries that would result from prohibiting residents from being 17 assessed library taxes for more than one public library or association 18 library; and 19 (c) minimizing the economic impact on public libraries and association 20 libraries of reduced revenue resulting from the prohibition of residents 21 from being assessed library taxes for more than one public library or 22 association library. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03540-01-5 A. 2030 2 1 § 2. The commissioner of taxation and finance shall submit a report to 2 the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the speaker of 3 the assembly one year after the effective date of this act. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed January 31, 2027.